Massachusetts, session 194th, S2983.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 186 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 15G. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following
meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
"Algorithmic device", any computational process derived from machine learning or other
artificial intelligence techniques, that processes or calculates nonpublic competitor data for the
purpose of advising a lessor or landlord concerning the amount of rent that the lessor or landlord
may consider charging a tenant; provided, however that "algorithmic device" shall not include:
(i) any report published periodically, but not more frequently than monthly, by a trade
association that receives renter data and publishes it in an aggregated and anonymous matter; or
(ii) a product used for the purpose of establishing rent or income limits in accordance with the
affordable housing program guidelines of a local government, the commonwealth, the federal
government or other political subdivision.
of 3

“Coordinating function”, any action utilizing nonpublic competitor data that includes: (i)
collecting historical or contemporaneous actual rent prices, supply levels or lease or rental
contract termination and renewal dates of residential dwelling units from two or more rental
property lessors or landlords; (ii) analyzing or processing of historical or contemporaneous actual
rent prices, supply levels or lease or rental contract termination and renewal dates of residential
dwelling units from two or more rental property lessors or landlords through use of a system,
software or process that uses computation, including by using the information to train an
algorithm; and (iii) recommending rental prices, lease renewal terms or ideal occupancy levels to
a rental property lessor or landlord.
"Coordinator", any person who operates an algorithmic device, software or data analytics
service that performs a coordinating function for any residential rental property lessor or
landlord, including a residential rental property lessor or landlord performing a coordinating
function for their own benefit.
"Nonpublic competitor data", information that is not widely available or easily accessible
to the public, including information about actual rent prices, occupancy rates, lease start and end
dates, and similar data, regardless of whether the data are attributable to a specific competitor or
anonymized, and that is derived from or otherwise provided by any other lessor or landlord.
“Person”, any natural person or persons, or any corporation, partnership, company, trust
or association of persons.
"Residential Dwelling Unit", any house, apartment, accessory unit or other unit intended
to be used as a primary residence in the state.
of 3

(b) In setting the amount of rent to be charged to a tenant for the occupancy of a
residential dwelling unit, determining any change in the amount of rent to be charged to a tenant
for the renewed occupancy of a residential dwelling unit, or otherwise determining what amount
to charge a tenant to rent a residential dwelling unit, or determining occupancy levels of
residential dwelling units, no lessor or landlord shall employ, use or rely upon an algorithmic
device or coordinator.
(c) A violation of this section shall constitute a violation of section 2 of Chapter 93A. The
civil penalty for each violation of this section shall not exceed $5,000 per violation. For the
purposes of this section, each time a rent is determined, increased or otherwise set under
subsection (b) shall constitute a single and separate violation.
(d) In the case of any successful action to enforce liability pursuant to this chapter, the
costs of the action together with reasonable attorney fees, expert fees and the costs of
investigation as determined by the court shall be awarded to plaintiffs. Costs and attorney fees,
expert fees and the costs of investigation shall be awarded to the attorney general or municipality
where the attorney general or municipality successfully enforces this chapter.
of 3